Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4310
Tax Commissioner; assessment and collection of tax and penalties; duties.

The Tax Commissioner shall (1) based on personal knowledge or information available to the commissioner, assess the tax and applicable penalties upon any dealer subject to tax under section 77-4302 who has not paid the tax when due, (2) mail to the dealer at the dealer's last-known address as shown by the records of the Tax Commissioner or serve in person a written notice of the determination under section 77-4311, (3) demand immediate payment of the tax, and (4) if payment is not immediately made, collect the tax and penalties by any method prescribed in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act as limited by section 77-4312.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 10.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.